apertium-en-mt.mt.metadix
    <pardef n="ġ/did__adj">
      <e><p><l>did</l><r>did<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>dida</l><r>did<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>odda</l><r>did<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>odda</l><r>did<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="/aħmar__adj">
      <e><p><l>aħmar</l><r>aħmar<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ħamra</l><r>aħmar<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ħomor</l><r>aħmar<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ħomor</l><r>aħmar<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="/aħdar__adj">
      <e><p><l>aħdar</l><r>aħdar<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ħadra</l><r>aħdar<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ħodor</l><r>aħdar<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ħodor</l><r>aħdar<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="/abjad__adj">
      <e><p><l>abjad</l><r>abjad<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>bajda</l><r>abjad<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>bohod</l><r>abjad<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>bojod</l><r>abjad<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="/iswed__adj">
      <e><p><l>iswed</l><r>iswed<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sewda</l><r>iswed<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>suwed</l><r>iswed<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>suwed</l><r>iswed<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="griż__adj">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>i</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>i</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="letterarj/u__adj">
      <e><p><l>u</l><r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>i</l><r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>i</l><r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="kb/i[r]__adj">
      <e><p><l>i<prm/></l><r>i<prm/><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>i<prm/>a</l><r>i<prm/><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a<prm/></l><r>i<prm/><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a<prm/></l><r>i<prm/><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="Ewropa__np">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Ekwador__np">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Ċeċilja__np">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="extrej__n">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>s</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="moviment__n">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>i</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="bisesswalità__n">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="leave__n">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="oxxenit/à__n">
      <e><p><l>à</l><r>à<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ajiet</l><r>à<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="dinj/a__n">
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iet</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="d/ar__n">
      <e><p><l>ar</l><r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>jar</l><r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="friġ/ġ__n">
      <e><p><l>ġ</l><r>ġ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>is</l><r>ġ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ġijiet</l><r>ġ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="k/tieb__n">
      <e><p><l>tieb</l><r>tieb<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>otba</l><r>tieb<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="/raġel__n">
      <e><p><l>raġel</l><r>raġel<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>irġiel</l><r>raġel<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="dad/a__n">
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>i</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kwotazzjoni__n">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>jiet</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="s/ena__n">
      <e><p><l>ena</l><r>ena<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>nin</l><r>ena<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="eżempj/u__n">
      <e><p><l>u</l><r>u<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>i</l><r>u<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="tim__n">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ijiet</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="artist/a__n">
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>u<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>i</l><r>u<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="b/użżieqa__n">
      <e><p><l>użżieqa</l><r>użżieqa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>żieżaq</l><r>użżieqa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="buff/u__n">
      <e><p><l>u</l><r>u<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>i</l><r>u<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>u<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>i</l><r>u<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Ċek__n">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>i</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>i</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Ingliż__adj">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>i</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>i</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="deżert__n">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>i</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="k/elma__n">
      <e><p><l>elma</l><r>elma<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>elmiet</l><r>elma<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="cnt"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>liem</l><r>elma<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="tuffi/eħa__n">
      <e><p><l>eħa</l><r>eħa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ħiet</l><r>eħa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="cnt"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eħ</l><r>eħa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="twil"><i>tw</i><par n="kb/i[r]__adj" prm="l"/></e>
    <e lm="żgħir"><i>żgħ</i><par n="kb/i[r]__adj" prm="r"/></e>
    <e lm="rqiq"><i>rq</i><par n="kb/i[r]__adj" prm="q"/></e>
    <e lm="sħiħ"><i>sħ</i><par n="kb/i[r]__adj" prm="ħ"/></e>
    <e lm="ġdid"><i>ġ</i><par n="ġ/did__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="aħmar"><i></i><par n="/aħmar__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="aħdar"><i></i><par n="/aħdar__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="abjad"><i></i><par n="/abjad__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="iswed"><i></i><par n="/iswed__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="fond"><i>fond</i><par n="griż__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="tond"><i>tond</i><par n="griż__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="frisk"><i>frisk</i><par n="griż__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="letterarju"><i>letterarj</i><par n="letterarj/u__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="pekunjarju"><i>pekunjarj</i><par n="letterarj/u__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="sekular"><i>sekular</i><par n="griż__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="amministratur"><i>amministratur</i><par n="moviment__n"/></e>
    <e lm="marsupjal"><i>marsupjal</i><par n="moviment__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kontinent"><i>kontinent</i><par n="moviment__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tim"><i>tim</i><par n="tim__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dar"><i>d</i><par n="d/ar__n"/></e>
    <e lm="extrej"><i>extrej</i><par n="extrej__n"/></e>
    <e lm="buffu"><i>buff</i><par n="buff/u__n"/></e>
    <e lm="estensjoni"><i>estensjoni</i><par n="kwotazzjoni__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kreazzjoni"><i>kreazzjoni</i><par n="kwotazzjoni__n"/></e>
    <e lm="respirazzjoni"><i>respirazzjoni</i><par n="kwotazzjoni__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kelma"><i>k</i><par n="k/elma__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tuffieħa"><i>tuffi</i><par n="tuffi/eħa__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ewkaristija"><i>ewkaristij</i><par n="dad/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="enerġija"><i>enerġij</i><par n="dad/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="podoloġija"><i>podoloġij</i><par n="dad/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bużżieqa"><i>b</i><par n="b/użżieqa__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ateiżmu"><i>ateiżm</i><par n="eżempj/u__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ibridiżmu"><i>ibridiżm</i><par n="eżempj/u__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pluraliżmu"><i>pluraliżm</i><par n="eżempj/u__n"/></e>
    <e lm="friġġ"><i>friġ</i><par n="friġ/ġ__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ktieb"><i>k</i><par n="k/tieb__n"/></e>
    <e lm="raġel"><i></i><par n="/raġel__n"/></e>
    <e lm="finalista"><i>finalist</i><par n="artist/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="umanista"><i>umanist</i><par n="artist/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="xjentista"><i>xjentist</i><par n="artist/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="diversità"><i>diversità</i><par n="bisesswalità__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gravità"><i>gravità</i><par n="bisesswalità__n"/></e>
    <e lm="omosesswalità"><i>omosesswalità</i><par n="bisesswalità__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mistoqsija"><i>mistoqsij</i><par n="dinj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lumija"><i>lumij</i><par n="dinj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="falsità"><i>falsit</i><par n="oxxenit/à__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kurżità"><i>kurżit</i><par n="oxxenit/à__n"/></e>
    <e lm="prosperità"><i>prosperit</i><par n="oxxenit/à__n"/></e>
    <e lm="deżert"><i>deżert</i><par n="deżert__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Ingliż"><i>Ingliż</i><par n="Ċek__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Afrikan"><i>Afrikan</i><par n="Ċek__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Awstraljan"><i>Awstraljan</i><par n="Ċek__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Afrikan"><i>Afrikan</i><par n="Ingliż__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="Amerikan"><i>Amerikan</i><par n="Ingliż__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="Awstraljan"><i>Awstraljan</i><par n="Ingliż__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="sena"><i>s</i><par n="s/ena__n"/></e>
    <e lm="leave tal-mard"><i>leave<b/>tal-mard</i><par n="leave__n"/></e>
    <e lm="leave tal-maternità"><i>leave<b/>tal-maternità</i><par n="leave__n"/></e>
    <e lm="leave għall-maternità"><i>leave<b/>għall-maternità</i><par n="leave__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dinja"><i>dinj</i><par n="dinj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Venezwela"><i>Venezwela</i><par n="Ewropa__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Slovakkja"><i>Slovakkja</i><par n="Ewropa__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Ġermanja"><i>Ġermanja</i><par n="Ewropa__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Ekwador"><i>Ekwador</i><par n="Ekwador__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Peru"><i>Peru</i><par n="Ekwador__np"/></e>
    <e lm="San Marino"><i>San<b/>Marino</i><par n="Ekwador__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Ċeċilja"><i>Ċeċilja</i><par n="Ċeċilja__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Santa Ċeċilja"><i>Santa<b/>Ċeċilja</i><par n="Ċeċilja__np"/></e>
